Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1604.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2173. Mandatory firearms training for certain officers.(a) Requirement.--An officer REQUIREMENT.-- (1) AN OFFICER IN A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY shall attend and complete mandatory in-service firearms training courses conducted by a certified law enforcement firearms instructor at least four times each year.(2) THE FIREARMS TRAINING UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) SHALL INCLUDE VIRTUAL OR PHYSICAL SIMULATION TRAININGS WHICH ARE DESIGNED TO PROVIDE OPPORTUNITIES FOR SKILL DEVELOPMENT IN LIVE ACTION SITUATIONS TO PREPARE OFFICERS FOR ACTIVE EVENTS <--<--1234567891011121314151617 THAT MAY REQUIRE THE USE OF FORCE.(B) SIMULATION TRAINING.--THE COMMISSION SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE SIMULATION TRAINING, CONDUCTED BY A CERTIFIED LAW ENFORCEMENT FIREARMS INSTRUCTOR, FOR USE BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY AT LEAST TWO TIMES PER YEAR, SUBJECT TO THE AVAILABILITY OF FACILITIES CAPABLE OF PROVIDING SIMULATION TRAINING.(b) (C) Documentation.-- (1) A certified law enforcement firearms instructor and a law enforcement agency's chief officer must produce and maintain a record of any in-service firearms training courses an officer completes, including the number of rounds fired, the officer's scores and the firearms used in training.(2) The record shall be documented in the commission's training and certification system within 30 days of the end of each calendar year, including an officer's primary duty weapon qualification to maintain certification as an officer.(c) (D) Penalty.--An officer who fails to complete the training required under this section shall be placed by the law enforcement agency on administrative leave until the training is completed.(d) (E) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Certified law enforcement firearms instructor." A firearms instructor authorized by the commission to conduct firearms training to a police officer within this Commonwealth."Law enforcement agency." A public agency of a municipality or county having general police powers and charged with making arrests in connection with the enforcement of criminal or traffic laws.20250HB1604PN2518 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Officer." A police officer employed by a law enforcement agency in a county of the second class A with a population between 565,000 and 600,000 according to the 2020 Federal decennial census . " SIMULATION TRAINING." A PHYSICAL OR VIRTUAL TRAINING SIMULATOR DESIGNED TO PROVIDE REALISTIC AND IMMERSIVE TRAINING SCENARIOS FOR OFFICERS, INCLUDING ALLOWING FOR THE ABILITY TO CREATE CUSTOM SCENARIOS USING REAL-WORLD DATA.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1604PN2518 - 3 - <--<--123456789